Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,132
Detention and staff secure juvenile facility; inspection; failure to meet minimum standards; corrective action.

If an inspection under sections 83-4,124 to 83-4,134.02 discloses that the criminal detention facility, juvenile detention facility, or staff secure juvenile facility does not meet the minimum standards established by the Jail Standards Board, the board shall send notice, together with the inspection report, to the governing body responsible for the facility. The appropriate governing body shall promptly meet to consider the inspection report, and the inspection personnel shall appear before the governing body to advise and consult concerning appropriate corrective action. The governing body shall then initiate appropriate corrective action within six months after the receipt of such inspection report or may voluntarily close the facility or the objectionable portion thereof.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 31;

Laws 1978, LB 212, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 83-951;

Laws 1992, LB 1184, § 21;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 19;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 68;

Laws 2016, LB894, § 22;

Laws 2020, LB230, § 3.